Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.037

Gifts, grants, conveyances—Receipt, sale—Rules.

The secretary of state and the *council may accept gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises, of real or personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise, and sell, lease, exchange, invest, or expend these donations or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income from the donations except as limited by the donor's terms. The secretary of state shall adopt rules to govern and protect the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds.

[ 1996 c 253 s 105.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: 1996 c 253 s 101, which created the international education and exchange council, was vetoed.

Findings—Purpose—Severability—Part headings not law—1996 c 253: See notes following RCW 28B.109.010.